District of Columbia statutes.
31-4321

Repealed

Reinsurance by Superintendent

Repealed.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 59(a), 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., §§ 35-419 to 35-421.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-76, March 17, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1626).
D.C. Law 10-76 and D.C. Law 10-103 purported to amend former § 35-419 1981 Ed. by rewriting (a)(4).